Massachusetts, session 194th, H3628.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The Massachusetts Department of Transportation, in conjunction with the Executive
Office of Energy and Environmental Affairs, shall convene a working group to identify and
evaluate the safe, efficient and environmentally sound maintenance and improvement of unpaved
(dirt and gravel) roads and paved low volume roads (LVR) in the Commonwealth.
The working group shall, at a minimum: develop a database of both unpaved roads and
paved LVRs; analyze the unpaved road miles and paved LVR miles per municipality and county
in relation to other road miles in the same municipality and county; collect data on the annual
maintenance and improvement costs for unpaved roads and paved LVR over the previous five
years for each municipality located in a county whose unpaved road miles total over 20% of total
county roadway mileage; examine the potential relationship between climate change and
of 2

maintenance and improvement costs for unpaved roads and paved LVRs; identify existing
funding streams in Massachusetts available to municipalities to maintain and improve unpaved
roads and paved LVRs; identify potential funding gaps to support the safe, efficient and
environmentally sound maintenance and improvement of unpaved and paved LVRs in the
Commonwealth; compile and review existing studies and reports on unpaved roads and paved
LVRs in the Commonwealth; determine the feasibility of developing a condition rating system
for unpaved roads and paved LVRs; determine the feasibility of developing statewide standards
for unpaved roads; research national best practices on the safe, efficient and environmentally
sound maintenance and improvement for unpaved roads and paved LVRs including existing
state-funded maintenance programs.
The working group shall include, but shall not be limited to: the secretary of
transportation or a designee, who shall serve as co-chair; the secretary of energy and
environmental affairs or a designee, who shall serve as co-chair; the commissioner of revenue or
a designee; the secretary of public safety and security or a designee; a designee of the rural
policy advisory commission; two designees of the Massachusetts Highway Association; a
designee of the Massachusetts Municipal Association, Inc.; a transportation planner from a MA
Transportation Planning Organization; a designee of the University of Massachusetts Amherst
Transportation Center; and a designee of the Massachusetts Association of Conservation
Commissions, Inc. The working group shall hold its first meeting not later than January 1, 2026.
The working group shall submit its findings to the clerks of the house of representatives
and the senate, the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means, the chairs of
the joint committee on environment, natural resources and agriculture and the chairs of the joint
committee on transportation not later than June 30, 2026.
of 2